Utah statutes.
65A-1-2.   Forestry, Fire, and State Lands Advisory Council -- Creation -- Responsibilities.

(1) (a)  The Forestry, Fire, and State Lands Advisory Council is created within the Department of Natural Resources.

(b)  The council advises the Division of Forestry, Fire, and State Lands on matters relating to state land management.

(c) (i)  Where reference is made in the Utah Code to the State Land Board or the Board of State Lands, it shall be construed as referring to the Forestry, Fire, and State Lands Advisory Council, but only if the reference pertains to advisory functions, powers, and duties related to state land management.

(ii)  In all other instances, the reference shall be construed as referring to the Division of Forestry, Fire, and State Lands, except in matters related to school and institutional trust lands as defined in Section 53C-1-103, in which case the reference shall be considered as referring to the director of school and institutional trust lands or its board of trustees.

(2)  In carrying out its responsibilities the council shall provide the division with advice and expertise for the administration of state lands under comprehensive land management policies using multiple use-sustained yield principles.

